Louisiana, session 2026, HB588.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:5.5.3(D)(15) through (18) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§5.5.3. Seafood Safety Task Force; creation; purpose
* * *
D. The task force shall be composed of the following fourteen members:
* * *
(15) A representative from the oyster industry appointed by the Oyster Task
Force.
(16) A representative from the crab industry appointed by the Crab Task
Force.
(17) A representative from the finfish industry appointed by the Louisiana
Finfish Task Force.
(18) A representative of the crawfish industry.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.